District of Columbia statutes.
10-551.09

Transition.

To facilitate the establishment of the Department, the City Administrator is authorized to coordinate and implement the transition process for the Department. The City Administrator shall transmit to the Council, which shall approve or disapprove by resolution, an implementation plan for the new agency no later than September 1, 2011. The plan shall:

(1)

Include an organizational chart;

(2)

Identify redundant positions and functions; and

(3)

Include a plan for transferring employees that details how many employees will be required to re-apply for new positions.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1030, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1010 of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).